California statutes. Water Code
If a contract with the state, the department, any other district, or the United States requires the establishment of a reserve fund for the payment by the district under the contract of periodic service charges or capital charges, or both, or if the board finds it to be necessary or desirable in the interest of the district, the board may determine to levy an assessment to provide such a reserve fund. In that event the board shall also determine the amount of the initial deposit or deposits to be made in the reserve fund and the amount of the balance, if any, to be maintained therein. The total amount of the initial deposit or deposits to be made in the reserve fund may be levied at one time, or in a series of installments from time to time, in the same manner as periodic service charges, as provided in Section 44030. Any later deposits necessary in order to maintain a required balance in the reserve fund shall be levied in the same manner. The reserve fund shall be used solely for the payment of the charges for which it is established, until all the charges have been paid. Any balance then remaining in the reserve fund shall be transferred to the general fund of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 83.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Transfer or Deposit of Bonds [44055. - 44059.]

44055.

In case any contract is made with the United States, bonds of the district may be transferred to or deposited with the United States if so provided by the contract, at not less than their par value, to the amount, or any part thereof, to be paid by the district to the United States. The interest or principal, or both, of the bonds may be regularly paid to the United States and applied as provided in the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

44056.

The bonds may:

(a) Call for the payment of interest not exceeding 6 percent per year.

(b) Be of the denomination specified in the contract.

(c) Call for the repayment of the principal at such times as specified in the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

44057.

The contract with the United States may call for the payment of the amount, or any part thereof, to be paid by the district to the United States at specified times, in installments, and with interest not exceeding 6 percent per year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

44058.

The board may accept, on behalf of the district, appointment of the district as fiscal agent of the United States or authorization of the district by the United States to make collection of money for and on behalf of the United States and to assume the duties and liabilities incident to such action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

44059.

The board as fiscal agent of the United States may do any and all things required by the federal statutes now or hereafter enacted in connection therewith and all things required by any rules or regulations now or hereafter established under any such federal statutes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Distribution of Water [44080. - 44082.]

44080.

All water which the district has the right to use under any contract with the United States may be distributed and apportioned by the district in accordance with acts of Congress applicable thereto and any rules or regulations thereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

44081.

Provision may be made in the contract between the district and the state, the department, any other district, or the United States for the refusal of water service to any land which may become delinquent in the payment of any assessment levied for the purpose of carrying out any contract between the district and the state, the department, any other district, or the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

44082.

As partial consideration for privileges obtained by the district under contract with the United States, any rights of way or rights to water or other property owned or acquired by the district may be conveyed by the board to the United States insofar as the same may be needed for the construction, operation, and maintenance of works by the United States for the benefit of the district under any contract that may be entered into with the United States pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Dissolution or Change of Boundaries [44105. - 44105.]

44105.

A contract between the district and the state, the department, any other district, or the United States may provide that the district shall not be dissolved nor shall the boundaries be changed except upon the written consent of the state, the department, any other district, or a specified official of the United States, filed with the official records of the district. If the consent of the state, the department, any other district, or the United States official is given and land is excluded, the areas excluded shall be free from all liens and charges for payments to become due to the state, the department, any other district, or the United States under the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Semitropic Water Storage District [44200. - 44208.]

44200.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this chapter:

(a) “Basin” means the Kern County Groundwater Basin, as defined in Bulletin 118.

(b) “District” means the Semitropic Water Storage District and its improvement districts.

(c) “Groundwater extraction facility” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10721.

(d) “Management area” means the portion of the basin within the boundaries of the district where the district has jurisdiction to implement specific management
 practices.

(e) “Project” means the “Tulare Lake Storage and Floodwater Protection Project” as described in the concept paper received by the California Water Commission on March 31, 2016, and any other groundwater storage or recharge project authorized by the district and for which the district completes environmental review on or before January 1, 2020.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 439, Sec. 1.   (AB 453)   Effective September 22, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

44202.

This chapter applies only to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 439, Sec. 1.   (AB 453)   Effective September 22, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

44204.

(a) The district may collect groundwater extraction information and require the reporting of groundwater information within the management area and, in furtherance of that goal, may do the following:

(1) Require registration of groundwater extraction facilities within the management area.

(2) Require that the use of every groundwater extraction facility within the management area be measured by a water-measuring device satisfactory to the district.

(3) Require that all costs associated with the purchase and installation of the water-measuring device pursuant to paragraph (2)
 be borne by the owner or operator of each groundwater extraction facility. Water-measuring devices shall be installed by the district or, at the district’s option, by the owner or operator of the groundwater extraction facility. Water-measuring devices shall be calibrated on a reasonable schedule as may be determined by the district.

(4) Require that the owner or operator of a groundwater extraction facility within the management area file an annual statement with the district setting forth the total extraction in acre-feet of groundwater from the facility during the previous year.

(b) In addition to the measurement of groundwater extractions pursuant to subdivision (a), the district may use any other reasonable method to determine groundwater extraction.

(c) The district may exempt from this section a person who,
 for domestic purposes, extracts two acre-feet or less of groundwater per year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 439, Sec. 1.   (AB 453)   Effective September 22, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

44206.

(a) In addition to levying assessments or fixing tolls and charges pursuant to Part 9 (commencing with Section 46000) and in lieu of imposing assessments in whole or in part, the district may impose fees on the extraction of groundwater from the basin to fund the costs of the following:

(1) Design, administration, operation, and maintenance of a project, including a prudent reserve.

(2) Acquisition of lands or other properties, facilities, and services to implement a project.

(3) Other costs directly related to design, implementation, maintenance, and operation of a
 project.

(b) (1) If the owner or operator of a groundwater extraction facility fails to timely comply with the requirements for reporting groundwater extractions pursuant to Section 44204, the district may make a determination of the quantity of groundwater extracted following an investigation. The determined amount shall not exceed the maximum production capacity of the groundwater extraction facility. The district shall mail notice to the owner or operator of the district’s determination of the quantity of groundwater extracted.

(2) The groundwater charges based on the determination pursuant to paragraph (1), together with any interest and penalties, shall be payable immediately unless, within 20 days after the district’s mailing of notice to the owner or operator of the district’s determination, the owner or operator files with the district a written
 protest setting forth the grounds for protesting the amount of groundwater extraction or groundwater charges, interest, or penalties.

(3) If a protest is filed pursuant to paragraph (2), the district shall hold a hearing to determine the total amount of groundwater extracted and the groundwater charges, interest, and penalties. Notice of the hearing shall be mailed to each protestant at least 20 days before the date fixed for the hearing.

(c) Fees imposed pursuant to this section shall be adopted in accordance with subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 6 of Article XIII D of the California Constitution.

(d) Fees imposed pursuant to this section may include fixed fees and fees charged on a volumetric basis, including, but not limited to, fees that increase based on the quantity of groundwater produced annually, the year
 in which the production of groundwater commenced from a groundwater extraction facility, and impacts to the basin.

(e) Fees imposed pursuant to this chapter shall be collected in the same manner as otherwise provided in Article 4 (commencing with Section 47180) of Chapter 7 of Part 9.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 439, Sec. 1.   (AB 453)   Effective September 22, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

44208.

(a) This chapter shall not be construed as state approval, authorization, or funding of a project, including, but not limited to, funding available pursuant to the Water Quality, Supply, and Infrastructure Improvement Act of 2014.

(b) A project shall comply with all applicable state laws, including, but not limited to, Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code, Division 2 (commencing with Section 1000), and Part 2.74 (commencing with Section 10720) of Division 6.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 439, Sec. 1.   (AB 453)   Effective September 22, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 7. FINANCIAL ORGANIZATION [44400. - 44963.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Financial Provisions [44400. - 44457.]



  ARTICLE 1. Limitations on Liabilities [44400. - 44401.]

44400.

A district may not incur any debt or liability whatever in excess of the express provisions of this division. Any debt or liability so incurred is void.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

44401.

Nothing contained in this article shall be construed to limit the right of the board to enter into any contract or lease for property, as in this division provided, and to bind the district for the payment of the rental or consideration specified in the lease or contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Statements and Reports [44425. - 44428.]

44425.

The county treasurer of each of the several counties shall report all transactions of delinquencies on district assessments and sales of land within the district to the treasurer of the district who shall keep a record thereof in the office of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

44426.

The district treasurer shall report to the board in writing at its regular meeting in each month the amount of money in the district treasury and the amount of receipts and the amount and items of expenditures for the month preceding. The report shall be verified and filed with the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

44428.

The board, following each fiscal year, shall render and promptly thereafter cause to be published in the county at least once a week for two successive weeks a verified statement of the financial condition of the district, showing particularly the receipts and disbursements of the last preceding fiscal year, together with the source of the receipts and purpose of the disbursements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 85.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Payment of Claims [44455. - 44457.]

44455.

All claims against the district shall be paid by warrants of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

44456.

To provide a fund for payment of claims, the board may from time to time draw from the general fund deposited and kept to the credit of the district in the office of the county treasurer of a county having funds belonging to the district in his possession such sums as may be necessary. The sums shall be deposited with the treasurer of the district and paid out by him upon warrants of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

44457.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1715.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Warrants [44600. - 44635.]



  ARTICLE 1. Execution [44600. - 44602.]

44600.

Warrants drawn by the department shall be drawn upon the treasurer of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 91.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

44601.

Warrants drawn by the board shall be signed by its president or vice president and secretary or assistant secretary and countersigned by the treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

44602.

Warrants drawn by the board for payment of principal or interest on bonds shall be drawn upon the county treasurer of a county having funds belonging to the district in his possession, or upon a bank having funds belonging to the district on deposit, and upon the treasurer of the district or the county treasurer of such a county or upon such a bank, as the case may be, for payment of all other claims and demands.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 695.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Payment [44625. - 44635.]

44625.

The provisions of this article are applicable only to warrants payable on demand.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

44626.

Whenever any warrant of the district is presented for payment when funds are not available for payment, it shall thereafter draw interest at a rate determined by resolution of the board, not to exceed 7 percent per year, until public notice is given that such funds are available.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

44627.

Upon the presentation of warrants for payment when funds for payment are not available, the treasurer of the district or of the county, as the case may be, shall endorse on them all of the following:

(a) “Funds not available for payment.”

(b) The date of presentation.

(c) The interest that the warrants shall thereafter bear.

(d) His signature.

A warrant so registered is a registered warrant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

44628.

The treasurer shall keep a record showing all of the following:

(a) Number and amount of each registered warrant.

(b) Date of its issuance.

(c) Person in whose favor it was issued.

(d) Date of its presentation for payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

44629.

The registered warrant is a contract in writing for the payment of money, and the period prescribed for the commencement of an action based upon the warrant is four years from the date of issuance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

44630.

Whenever there is sufficient money in the treasury to pay all outstanding registered warrants or whenever the board orders that all registered warrants presented for payment prior to a certain date be paid and there is sufficient money available for payment, the proper treasurer shall give notice of this.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

44631.

The notice shall state that the treasurer is prepared to pay all registered warrants or all registered warrants presented for payment prior to the date fixed by the board. No further description of the warrants entitled to payment need be made in the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

44632.

The notice shall be published once a week for two successive weeks in some newspaper published in the office county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

44633.

All warrants designated in the notice shall cease to draw interest at the time of the first publication of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

44634.

Upon the presentation of any warrant entitled to payment under the terms of the notice, the treasurer shall pay it together with interest due on it from the date of its original presentation for payment to the date of the first publication of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

44635.

The treasurer shall enter all of the following in the record of registered warrants he is required to keep:

(a) Dates of the payment of all the warrants.

(b) Names of the persons to whom payments are made.

(c) Amount paid to each person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Funds [44750. - 44853.]



  ARTICLE 1. Proceeds of Bond Sales [44750. - 44751.]

44750.

The proceeds of sale of district bonds shall be placed in the treasuries of the respective affected counties to the amount of the unpaid assessment in each county and credited to the bond fund of the district, except that any premium received upon the sale of district bonds shall be credited to the bond reserve fund of the district if the resolution of the board directing the sale of the bonds so provides. Said proceeds may be used for the purposes for which the bonds were authorized to be issued under Part 8 (commencing with Section 45100) of this division. Upon completion of an adopted project, or any unit thereof, any balance in said fund shall be used exclusively for the payment of principal of or interest on the bonds sold, or shall be deposited in the bond reserve fund or shall be used for the purchase at not more than par and cancellation of any such bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 81.)
-------------------------------------------

44751.

A proper record of the transaction shall be made upon the books of the district treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Proceeds of Assessments [44775. - 44778.]

44775.

The county treasurer shall deposit in the county treasury to the credit of the bond fund of the district all money collected upon any assessment upon which bonds have been issued, including all the following:

(a) Money derived from sale of land for delinquent installments.

(b) Money derived from redemption of land.

(c) Money derived from sale of land bought by the treasurer at a sale for delinquent installments as trustee of the district bond fund.

(d) Money derived from interest and penalties.

(e) The amount of purchase money paid in bonds or coupons on sales made under any assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

44776.

Money collected upon any assessment upon which bonds have been issued shall be used exclusively for the payment of principal and interest of the bonds issued on the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

44777.

The county treasurer shall transmit to the treasurer of the district all canceled bonds and coupons received in payment on any delinquent sale and a memorandum of all sums endorsed as paid upon account of purchase money on any specified bonds or coupons. All money collected by any county treasurer upon account of an assessment on which bonds shall not have been issued shall be similarly accounted for to the treasurer of the district, and shall be credited to the general fund of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

44778.

Any balance remaining in the bond fund after payment in full of the principal and interest of all outstanding bonds of the district shall be transferred by the county treasurer to the general fund of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Proceeds of Sale of Land [44800. - 44806.]

44800.

Any parcel of land bid in and purchased by any county treasurer as trustee of the bond fund of the district may be sold and conveyed by him or his successor in office at any time after the expiration of the redemption period of three years, at public sale with notice, to the highest bidder. The trustee shall have the right to reject any and all bids.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1086.)
-------------------------------------------

44800.5.

Any parcel of land bid in and purchased by any county treasurer as trustee of the bond fund of the district as provided in this division may, without notice, be sold and conveyed by him or his successor in office at private sale to the owner of record at the date of the certificate of sale or to the owner’s successor in interest, upon his paying to such trustee the amount for which the same was struck off to said trustee with interest thereon at the rate of 7 percent per year, compounded yearly, from the date of the delinquent sale, together with any call that has been made upon any prior or subsequent assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1086.)
-------------------------------------------

44801.

Payment may be made either in cash or in matured bonds and coupons issued on the assessment, taken at their face value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

44802.

The treasurer shall execute a deed to the purchaser upon the sale, conveying the property free of encumbrances, except as provided for deeds where no redemption is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

44803.

If any land held by a county treasurer as trustee of the bond fund of a district remains unsold after the final installment of the assessment has been collected by payment or sale, each county treasurer shall sell all the land held by him at public auction to the highest bidder for cash.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

44804.

Notice of the sale shall be given by publication once a week for two successive weeks in some newspaper published in the county in which the land is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

44805.

The county treasurer shall deposit the proceeds of the sale in the treasury of the county to the credit of the bond fund of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

44806.

Each county treasurer shall charge to the general fund of the district, or to the bond fund if he has no money to the credit of the general fund, the expense of publication of notices and of recording certificates of sale, and shall notify the treasurer of the district of the charge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Alternative Provisions for the Deposit of Funds [44850. - 44853.]

44850.

This article provides an alternative procedure for the deposit of all, or any part of, proceeds of bond sales, proceeds of assessments and proceeds of sale of land and of all, or any part of, other funds of a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 695.)
-------------------------------------------

44851.

The board may at any time, by resolution, elect to proceed under this article with respect to the deposit of funds of the district, and the board may at any time thereafter terminate its election to proceed under this article, and thereafter, the provisions of this article shall no longer apply. No such resolution shall be effective until a certified copy thereof shall be filed with the auditor and treasurer of each county within which a district is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 695.)
-------------------------------------------

44852.

Any money belonging to a district may be deposited by the treasurer pursuant to the general laws governing the deposit of public money.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 695.)
-------------------------------------------

44853.

Where the deposit of money is insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation no additional security need be required from the bank for the portion of the district’s deposits so insured.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 695.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Warrants Payable at Future Times [44900. - 44910.]

44900.

If any contract or lease for the acquisition of property provides for any future payments by the district, warrants may be issued, on order of the board, for the payments, which warrants shall be made payable at the times provided in the contract or lease.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1367.)
-------------------------------------------

44901.

When a particular purpose or emergency assessment has been authorized, warrants in an amount equal to the amount of the assessment may be issued on order of the board to carry out the purpose for which the assessment was authorized. These warrants shall be made payable at the time or times that the board estimates that they can be paid from the proceeds of the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1367.)
-------------------------------------------

44902.

Any outstanding registered warrants and their accrued interest may be refunded by the issuance of warrants payable at stated times fixed by the board. These warrants may be exchanged for the registered warrants or sold for not less than their par value to provide funds for the payment of the registered warrants or any of them and their accrued interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1367.)
-------------------------------------------

44903.

Warrants payable at a future time or times may be issued in consideration of money loaned to the district for the purchase of any of its outstanding bonds or the refinancing or retiring of any outstanding contract. The annual interest payable on these warrants shall be less than the annual interest on the bonds purchased or contract refinanced or retired with the proceeds of the warrants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1367.)
-------------------------------------------

44904.

Warrants payable at a future time or times may also be issued to obtain funds or property for any lawful purpose of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 92.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

44905.

Any warrant authorized in the preceding sections of this article shall draw interest at a rate to be fixed by the board not to exceed 6 percent per year payable annually or semiannually as the board may prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1367.)
-------------------------------------------

44906.

Coupons payable to bearer in a form and signed as prescribed by the board may be attached to warrants payable at a future date to evidence their interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1367.)
-------------------------------------------

44907.

Warrants of any district may be issued to evidence the indebtedness allowed to be incurred prior to the levy of the first district assessment, bearing interest fixed by the board at not more than 7 percent per year. These warrants shall be made payable on a date not later than the first day of July next after the first annual assessment in the district is levied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1367.)
-------------------------------------------

44908.

If any district owns any property which it is authorized to lease or sell, its board may in the contract providing for the issuance of warrants payable at a future time, agree that the proceeds of the lease or sale of the property, not required by law to be used for other purposes, shall be allocated to the payment of these warrants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1367.)
-------------------------------------------

44909.

No warrants issued pursuant to this article made payable more than five years from the date of issuance shall be valid unless their issuance is authorized by a majority of the voters voting at an election called by the board for the purpose of determining whether or not the warrants shall be authorized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1367.)
-------------------------------------------

44910.

Notice of the election shall be given and the election shall be held and the result determined as nearly as practicable in the manner provided for bond elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1367.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Revenue Warrants [44950. - 44963.]

44950.

A district may issue revenue warrants pursuant to this chapter to obtain funds for any lawful purpose of the district, including the repayment of indebtedness of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

44951.

Revenue warrants shall be secured by all or part of the revenues received by the district from tolls or charges levied pursuant to Section 43006 or from any other source other than assessments, and any such revenues may be pledged to the payment of revenue warrants. In the resolution authorizing the issuance of revenue warrants, the board may subject such revenues as it specifies to a lien or charge to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the revenue warrants, but such warrants shall not be secured by any lien or charge upon any assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

44952.

Revenue warrants shall bear interest at a rate or rates not exceeding 8 percent per annum, payable annually or semiannually or in part annually and in part semiannually, as the board may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

44953.

Revenue warrants shall mature at such time or times as the board may prescribe, but not more than five years from the date of issuance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

44954.

Revenue warrants may be made subject to redemption prior to their fixed maturity date upon such terms, conditions and notice, and at such times and prices, as the board may determine prior to the issuance of such warrants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

44955.

Revenue warrants may be sold at either public or private sale upon such terms and conditions as the board may determine. Such warrants may be sold at less than their par or face value, but no revenue warrant may be sold at a price which would yield to the purchaser an average of more than 8 percent per annum, payable semiannually, according to standard tables of bond values.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 188.)
-------------------------------------------

44957.

The board may determine the form and denomination of revenue warrants, the manner of their execution, their registration and exchange privileges and the place or places of their payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

44958.

The board, in a resolution authorizing the issuance of revenue warrants, may provide for special funds for the deposit and application of the proceeds of the warrants and for the deposit and application of revenues pledged to secure their payment. The board may provide for the establishment of a reserve fund from the proceeds of the revenue warrants or from revenues pledged to their payment. The board may appoint a fiscal agent to hold any or all such funds in trust for the holders of revenue warrants and for the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

44959.

The board, in a resolution authorizing the issuance of revenue warrants, may covenant to operate and maintain the facilities producing the revenues pledged for the security of the revenue warrants, may covenant to fix, maintain and collect tolls, charges, rates or fees which will produce revenues sufficient to provide for the payment of the principal of and interest on the revenue warrants and to provide such additional sums for the further security of the revenue warrants as the resolution may prescribe, and may make such other covenants, with respect to insurance, investments of funds, accounting records, independent audits, events of default, limitations upon competitive facilities and any other matters relating to the revenue warrants and their security as the board may deem necessary, convenient or desirable in order better to secure the revenue warrants or to make them more marketable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

44960.

The board, in a resolution authorizing the issuance of revenue warrants, may provide for paying the interest on the revenue warrants for a period of not more than one year out of the proceeds of the sale thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

44961.

Except as otherwise provided in any resolution authorizing the issuance of revenue warrants, the holder of any revenue warrant may by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding require and compel the performance of any of the duties imposed upon the board, or upon any officer or employee of the district, in connection with the collection, deposit, investment, application or disbursement of any revenues pledged for the security of the revenue warrants, or in connection with the deposit, investment or disbursement of the proceeds received from the sale of the revenue warrants, or in connection with any covenants contained in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the revenue warrants. The enumeration of such rights and remedies does not, however, exclude the exercise or prosecution of any other rights or remedies available to the holders of revenue warrants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

44962.

Revenue warrants shall not be issued under this chapter by any district in any one fiscal year in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

44963.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 44953 and 44962, revenue warrants may be issued prior to August 1, 1978, pursuant to this chapter for a term not to exceed 10 years from the date of issuance and for an amount not in excess of four million dollars ($4,000,000) in any one fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 188.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 8. BONDS [45100. - 45932.]



  CHAPTER 1. In General [45100. - 45103.]

45100.

Whenever in any district any assessment has been levied and assessed upon land and remains unpaid in whole or in part, and in the judgment and opinion of the board it is for the best interest of the district or the landowners therein to issue bonds for the purpose of obtaining money to pay the costs of the proposed project, the indebtedness of the district, or any other lawful charge, or when a petition signed by the holders of title to more than one-fourth in assessed value of the land requesting it is filed with the secretary, the board shall by order entered upon its records call a special election to be held in the district. At the special election the question shall be submitted to the holders of title to assessed land whether or not bonds of the district shall be issued in an amount equal to the amount of the assessment, or the part of the assessment remaining unpaid. The amount shall be entered by the board in its records and stated in the order calling the special election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 95.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

45102.
